Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.290

State superintendent to make rules and regulations—Unforeseen conditions or actions to be recognized—Paperwork limited.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through * 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the provisions thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary to carry out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through * 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules and regulations which establish the terms and conditions for allowing school districts to receive state basic education moneys as provided in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year of one hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional hour offering imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following conditions:

(a) An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson, vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a school district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of common knowledge within the school district and of those events and circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through * 28A.160.220, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for information from local school districts; and to make every effort to integrate and standardize information requests for other state education acts and federal aid to education acts administered by the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce paperwork requirements and duplicative information requests.

[ 1992 c 141 s 504; 1990 c 33 s 111; 1981 c 285 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 6; 1973 1st ex.s. c 78 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 105 s 4; 1971 c 46 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 3 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.170. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 154 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.41.170, 28.41.170.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.160.220 was recodified as RCW 28A.300.035 pursuant to 1994 c 113 s 2.

Contingent effective date—1992 c 141 ss 502-504, 506, and 507: See note following RCW 28A.150.205.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.

Effective date—Severability—1972 ex.s. c 105: See notes following RCW 28A.150.250.